Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2254.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 14COMPASSIONATE ACCESS TO MEDICAL MARIJUANASection 1401. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819202122 The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Facility." Any of the following:(1) A health care facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(2) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the Health Care Facilities Act.(3) An assisted living residence as defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(4) A personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the Human Services Code."Practitioner." A health care practitioner as defined in section 103 of the Health Care Facilities Act."Program." The medical marijuana program established under section 301.Section 1402. Permitted use.(a) Facilities.--A facility shall permit a terminally ill patient to use or be administered medical marijuana in the facility if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The use or administration of the medical marijuana does not interfere with any part of the patient's treatment plan, as determined by a practitioner treating the patient at the facility.(2) The medical marijuana is not vaporized or in any other form that could impact care to other patients.(3) The patient or patient's caregiver presents a valid identification card.20260HB2254PN3188 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA IS IN A FORM PERMITTED UNDER SECTION 303.(3) THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA IS NOT VAPORIZED, SMOKED OR INGESTED IN ANY OTHER FORM THAT COULD IMPACT CARE TO OTHER PATIENTS.(4) THE PATIENT AND ANY CAREGIVER PRESENTS A VALID IDENTIFICATION CARD.(4) (5) The use or administration of the medical marijuana by or to the patient is documented in the patient's medical record.(b) Guidelines.--Not later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, a facility shall develop and disseminate written guidelines for the use or administration of medical marijuana within the facility under this chapter. The guidelines shall include:(1) A requirement that the medical marijuana be stored in a locked container.(2) Restrictions to ensure the safety of other patients, guests and employees of the facility.(3) The forms of medical marijuana allowed to be used or administered.(4) Procedures for documenting the medical marijuana use or administration.(5) Compliance with State laws and the safe operation of the facility.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring a facility to:(1) Allow the use or administration of medical marijuana by a patient receiving emergency services or a patient in an emergency department.20260HB2254PN3188 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) ALLOW THE USE OR ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICAL MARIJUANA BY OR TO A PATIENT RECEIVING EMERGENCY SERVICES, A PATIENT IN AN EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT OR A PATIENT IN A PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITAL, BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CRISIS CENTER, MEDICAL DETOX FACILITY, RESIDENTIAL DRUG AND ALCOHOL REHABILITATION FACILITY OR OTHER PSYCHIATRIC OR ADDICTION TREATMENT FACILITY.(2) Provide a patient with a certification or recommendation for the use or administration of medical marijuana.(3) Include medical marijuana in a patient's discharge plan.(4) Administer medical marijuana to the patient.(5) ALLOW THE USE OR ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICAL MARIJUANA WITHOUT A VALID CERTIFICATION OR IN A FORM NOT PERMITTED BY THIS ACT.(D) LIABILITY PROTECTION.--NEITHER A FACILITY NOR AN EMPLOYEE OF A FACILITY WHO ACTS IN GOOD FAITH AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO CRIMINAL, CIVIL OR ADMINISTRATIVE LIABILITY FOR AN INJURY OR HARM RESULTING FROM A PATIENT'S USE OF MEDICAL MARIJUANA OR A CAREGIVER'S ADMINISTRATION OF MEDICAL MARIJUANA WITHIN THE FACILITY UNLESS THE INJURY OR HARM RESULTS FROM GROSS NEGLIGENCE OR WILLFUL MISCONDUCT.Section 1403. Compliance.(a) Licensure.--A facility is not required to comply with this chapter to obtain, retain or renew a license as a facility.(b) Civil penalty.--A facility that commits a violation of this chapter or regulation issued under this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty up to $500 for each violation for each 20260HB2254PN3188 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 day the violation continues. Civil penalties shall be collected by the department from the date the facility receives notice of the violation. Penalties collected under this section shall be deposited into the fund.(c) Suspension.--(1) If a Federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of Justice or Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services initiates one of the following actions, a facility shall MAY suspend compliance with this chapter until the Federal regulatory agency, United States Department of Justice or Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services notifies the facility that it may resume permitting the use or administration of medical marijuana within the facility:(i) A Federal regulatory agency or the United States Department of Justice initiates enforcement action against a facility related to the RELATED TO A facility's compliance with a State-regulated program.(ii) A Federal regulatory agency, the United States Department of Justice or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services issues a rule or otherwise provides notification to the facility that expressly prohibits the use or administration of medical marijuana in facilities or otherwise prohibits compliance with a State-regulated program.(2) This subsection shall not be construed to permit a facility to prohibit the use or administration of medical marijuana under this chapter due solely to the fact that cannabis is a schedule I drug under 21 U.S.C. § 812 (relating to schedules of controlled substances) or other Federal constraints on the use or administration of medical marijuana 20260HB2254PN3188 - 5 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that existed prior to the effective date of this paragraph.Section 1404. Department duties.(a) Sample medical marijuana plan GUIDELINES .--The department, in consultation with the Department of Human Services, shall develop and make available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website sample guidelines that a facility may implement to meet the requirements of this chapter.(b) Educational sessions.--Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall host, virtual or in-person, no fewer than five educational sessions to inform facilities of the requirements of this chapter. At a minimum, the educational sessions under this subsection shall include:(1) Information on how to determine if:(i) An individual is a patient who possesses a valid identification card and is a participant in the program . (ii) A patient's caregiver is the individual designated by the patient, possesses a valid identification card and is a participant in the program . (2) Information on how to determine if an individual's marijuana product is legal under section 303 and was purchased from a dispensary HOLDING A VALID PERMIT UNDER THIS ACT . (3) Any other information the department determines necessary for a facility to properly implement this chapter.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days. AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE ADDITION OF SECTION 1402 OF THE ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 270 DAYS.(2) THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260HB2254PN3188 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.20260HB2254PN3188 - 7 - 1